Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 2 Members of Governing Bodies of Municipalities, Counties, and Other Public Bodies

45-9-20.
Insurance or contracts of indemnity; actions against insurers or indemnitors.

In addition to any other compensation which may be paid to members of the governing bodies of municipalities, counties, and other public bodies, and to supervisors, administrators, employees, or other elected or appointed public officers, each municipality, county, and other public body of this state is authorized, in its discretion, to purchase policies of liability insurance or contracts of indemnity insuring or indemnifying the members of such governing bodies and such supervisors, administrators, employees, or other elected or appointed officers against personal liability for damages arising out of the performance of their duties or in any way connected therewith, whether based upon negligence, violation of contract rights, or violation of civil, constitutional, common law, or other statutory rights, whether state, federal, or local. Such municipalities, counties, and other public bodies may expend state, federal, and local funds for such purposes. The amount of such insurance or indemnity shall also be in the discretion of the governing body of such municipality, county, or other public body. No action shall be maintained against the person or company issuing such insurance or contracting for such indemnity until final judgment has first been entered against the individual covered by such policy or contract.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 702, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 86/HB 24.

Cross references.

Liability of public agents on public contracts, §

10-6-88

.

Law reviews.

For article considering the public official’s potential liability for funds, losses and torts, and suggesting insurance coverage, see 11 Mercer L. Rev. 288 (1960).

For article, “Personal Liability of State Officials Under State and Federal Law,” see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 821 (1975).

For article on insurance and indemnity for Georgia local government officers under Georgia law, see 13 Ga. L. Rev. 747 (1979).

For article, “Evidence,” see 27 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2011).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2011).

45-9-21.
Defense of civil, criminal, or quasi-criminal actions in lieu of insurance.

In lieu of obtaining the insurance or indemnity referred to in Code Section 45-9-20 or in addition thereto, such municipalities, counties, and other public bodies may, in their discretion, as a part of the compensation and terms of employment of members of the governing bodies of such municipalities, counties, and other public bodies, and of supervisors, administrators, employees, or other elected or appointed officers, adopt policies whereby the municipality, county, and other public body will undertake to defend all or specified civil, criminal, or quasi-criminal actions brought or maintained against members of the municipality, county, or other public body, or against supervisors, administrators, employees, or other elected or appointed municipal or county officers, arising out of the performance of their duties or in any way connected therewith, whether based upon negligence, violation of contract rights, or violation of civil, constitutional, common law, or statutory rights.

The governing authority of a municipality, county, or other public body shall not be authorized to furnish a defense to any person charged with a criminal offense involving theft, embezzlement, or other like crime with respect to the property or money of or in which said governmental entity has an interest.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section, the governing authority of a municipality, county, or other public body shall be authorized to reimburse any person charged with a criminal offense involving theft, embezzlement, or other like crime with respect to the property or money of or in which said governmental entity has an interest for all or a part of the cost of the defense of such person if such person is found not guilty of such crime or if the charges against such person are dismissed or nolle prossed.

A municipality, county, or other public body may expend state, federal, and local funds to effectuate the provisions of this Code section, including, but not limited to, attorney’s fees, court costs, deposition costs, witness fees and compensation, and all other like costs, expenses, and fees.

As used in this subsection, the term “county officer” means the sheriff, the judge of the probate court, the clerk of the superior court, and the tax commissioner or tax collector and tax receiver of a county.

In any civil case in which the county attorney has a conflict of interest which would ethically prevent the county attorney from representing both the county, the governing authority of the county, or another county officer or employee and the county officer, upon a determination by the chief judge of the superior court of the circuit in which the county is located that an ethical conflict exists, the county officer shall be authorized to employ individual legal counsel to represent such county officer in such matter. The governing authority of the county shall pay the reasonable fees of such individual counsel and all applicable court costs, deposition costs, witness fees and compensation, and all other like reasonable costs, expenses, and fees; provided, however, that such attorneys’ fees shall be no more than the rate paid to the county attorney for similar representation or in accordance with a schedule of rates for outside counsel adopted by the governing authority, if any. Such fees and costs shall be authorized by the chief judge of the superior court of the circuit in which the county is located. This subsection shall not apply unless the governing authority of the county has first denied a written request by a county officer for counsel.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 702, § 3; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1821, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1063, § 1.

Law reviews.

For article, “Personal Liability of State Officials Under State and Federal Law,” see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 821 (1975).

For article on insurance and indemnity for Georgia local government officers under Georgia law, see 13 Ga. L. Rev. 747 (1979).

For annual survey of local government law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (2005).

45-9-22.
Payment of claims or judgment against members of municipal, county, or other public body.

Any municipality, county, or other public body may, in its discretion, adopt a policy establishing the terms and conditions under which it may pay part or all of any claim or civil judgment rendered against any person whose defense such municipality, county, or other public body is authorized to undertake under Code Section 45-9-21. Any such disbursement shall be deemed to be for public purposes and may be paid from state, federal, or local funds. No attempt shall be made at the trial of any action brought against a person covered under this Code section to suggest the fact that the municipality, county, or public body will be responsible for any judgment therein.

The failure to adopt a policy as provided in this Code section prior to making any payments authorized by this Code section shall not invalidate any such payments if the governing authority of the municipality, county, or public body shall, within a reasonable time after the fact of such failure has been brought to its attention, adopt a policy as provided in this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1380, § 1.

45-9-23.
Waiver of immunity from action.

Nothing in this article shall be construed as waiving any immunity or privilege of any kind now or hereafter enjoyed by any municipality, county, or other public body or by any member of the governing body thereof or by any supervisor, administrator, employee, or other elected or appointed officer or by any other public body, board, agency, or political subdivision of this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 702, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 45; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 45.

Cross references.

Liability of public agents on public contracts, §

10-6-88

.

Liability of municipal corporations for acts or omissions generally, T. 36,
C. 33.

Law reviews.

For article on insurance and indemnity for Georgia local government officers under Georgia law, see 13 Ga. L. Rev. 747 (1979).